Washington statutes.
RCW 6.32.150

Discontinuance or dismissal of proceedings.

A special proceeding instituted as prescribed in this chapter may be discontinued at any time upon such terms as justice requires, by an order of the judge made upon the application of the judgment creditor. Where the judgment creditor unreasonably delays or neglects to proceed, or where it appears that the judgment has been satisfied, the special proceedings may be dismissed upon like terms by a like order made upon the application of the judgment debtor, or of plaintiff in a judgment creditor's action against the debtor, or of a judgment creditor who has instituted either of the special proceedings authorized by this chapter.

[ 2004 c 165 s 35; 1893 c 133 s 15; RRS s 627.]

NOTES:

Purpose—Captions not law—2004 c 165: See notes following RCW 7.60.005.